Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the public supporting accountability and fast, effective treatment act, or public SAFE-T act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) In a court of limited jurisdiction, the court may, upon the motion of either party, agree to dismiss a defendant's simple misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor charge pursuant to the following:(a)(i) The court may continue a case pursuant to a defendant's agreement to waive speedy trial in anticipation of dismissal following court-ordered conditions for a period of no less than six months, up to a maximum of 12 months, and order the defendant to comply with terms, conditions, or programs that are connected to the underlying charge and reasonably related to supporting the defendant's rehabilitation.(ii) In determining which terms, conditions, or programs are appropriate to order, the court shall consider the defendant's specific circumstances affecting the underlying charge, including but not limited to whether the underlying charge is the result of or caused by a behavioral health disorder as defined in RCW 71.05.020, lack of access to stable housing or employment, or a combination of such factors, and whether the defendant has previously been identified as needing competency restoration treatment.(iii) The court shall consider ordering the defendant to participate in a recovery navigator program established under RCW 71.24.115, arrest and jail alternative program established under RCW 36.28A.450, law enforcement assisted diversion program established under RCW 71.24.589, Trueblood high utilizer program, or local diversion program, or a combination of such programs, to the extent such programs are available in the jurisdiction and are appropriate for the defendant's specific circumstances.(iv) The court shall hear from both parties and rule on the motion in open court.(b)(i) If the defendant has substantially complied with the imposed terms and conditions, the court shall dismiss the charges pending against the defendant at the end of the continuance period. The court must make written findings that provide an explanation for its decision to grant the dismissal.(ii) Full restitution must be a required condition for the dismissal of charges. However, a defendant's inability to pay restitution due to indigence may not be grounds for denial of this dismissal following progress towards complying with court-ordered conditions or as a basis for finding that the defendant has failed to substantially comply with the court's conditions.(iii) The court shall order the defendant to not commit any new criminal law violations for the entire continuance period as a condition for the dismissal of charges.(iv) The mandatory conditions described under (b)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection must not be the only conditions ordered by the court.(v) Prior to dismissing the charges pending against the defendant, the court shall provide an opportunity for victims and survivors of victims to present a statement personally or by representation.(c) If it appears to the prosecuting attorney that the defendant is not substantially complying with the terms and conditions, after providing the defendant with written notice of the alleged violations and disclosure of all evidence to be offered against the defendant, the court shall hold a hearing to determine whether the defendant has, by a preponderance of the evidence, willfully failed to substantially comply with the terms and conditions set by the court. At that hearing:(i) The rules of evidence do not apply, but the defendant must be afforded the due process rights required for the revocation of probation, including the right to confront and cross-examine all witnesses;(ii) The defendant must have the opportunity to be heard in person and to present evidence; and(iii) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant has failed to comply with the terms and conditions, the court may either continue the hearing to provide additional time for substantial compliance or end the period of continuance pending dismissal and set a new commencement date.(d) If the court agrees to dismiss a defendant's simple misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor charge, any written confirmation of completion of an assessment or statement indicating the defendant's enrollment or referral to a specific service or program, or any written updates regarding treatment or services, must be considered a treatment evaluation or compliance form ordered by the court for purposes of Washington state rules of court, General Rule GR 22.(e) Admissions made by the defendant in the course of receiving treatment or services pursuant to the agreement to dismiss may not be used against the defendant in the prosecution's case-in-chief.(2) A charge may not be dismissed pursuant to this section for any of the following offenses or any violations of equivalent local ordinances:(a) Any offense that would constitute a prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055 upon conviction;(b) Reckless driving under RCW 46.61.500;(c) Racing under RCW 46.61.530;(d) Reckless endangerment of roadway workers under RCW 46.61.527(4);(e) Negligent driving in the first degree under RCW 46.61.5249;(f) Negligent driving in the second degree under RCW 46.61.525;(g) Negligent driving in the second degree with a vulnerable user victim under RCW 46.61.526;(h) Hit and run (unattended vehicle or property) under RCW 46.52.010;(i) Hit and run (attended vehicle or property) under RCW 46.52.020(5);(j) Hit and run (striking a deceased person) under RCW 46.52.020(4)(c);(k) A domestic violence offense involving an intimate partner as defined in RCW 7.105.010;(l) Stalking under RCW 9A.46.110(5)(a);(m) Violation of a domestic violence protection order, sexual assault protection order, stalking protection order, or vulnerable adult protection order; an order issued under chapter 9A.40, 9A.44, 9A.46, 9A.88, 9.94A, 10.99, 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW; a valid foreign protection order as described in RCW 26.52.020; or a Canadian domestic violence protection order as defined in RCW 26.55.010;(n) Aiming or discharging firearms under RCW 9.41.230;(o) Hazing under RCW 28B.10.901(2)(a);(p) Animal cruelty in the second degree under RCW 16.52.207;(q) Assault in the fourth degree under RCW 9A.36.041;(r) Any offense with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135;(s) Communication with a minor or someone believed to be a minor for immoral purposes under RCW 9.68A.090(1);(t) Harassment under RCW 9A.46.020(2)(a);(u) Cyber harassment under RCW 9A.90.120(2)(a), excluding cyber harassment committed solely pursuant to the element set forth in RCW 9A.90.120(1)(a)(i);(v) Unlawful carrying or handling of a firearm under RCW 9.41.270;(w) Indecent exposure under RCW 9A.88.010(2) (a) or (b);(x) Disclosing intimate images under RCW 9A.86.010(7)(a);(y) Abandonment of a dependent person in the third degree under RCW 9A.42.080;(z) Leaving a child in the care of a sex offender under RCW 9A.42.110;(aa) Criminal mistreatment in the third degree under RCW 9A.42.035;(bb) Criminal mistreatment in the fourth degree under RCW 9A.42.037;(cc) Interfering with the reporting of domestic violence under RCW 9A.36.150;(dd) Reckless endangerment under RCW 9A.36.050;(ee) A violation of the provisions of an order to surrender and prohibit weapons, an extreme risk protection order, or any other protection order or no-contact order restraining the person or excluding the person from a residence;(ff) Any traffic offense involving a commercial driver's license or a commercial learner's permit, or involving the operation of a commercial motor vehicle; or(gg) Any offense that was originally filed as a felony charge and subsequently amended to, or refiled as, a gross misdemeanor or misdemeanor charge.Sec. 3. RCW 46.20.270 and 2024 c 308 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Every court having jurisdiction over offenses committed under this chapter, or any other act of this state or municipal ordinance adopted by a local authority regulating the operation of motor vehicles on highways, or any federal authority having jurisdiction over offenses substantially the same as those set forth in this title which occur on federal installations within this state, shall immediately forward to the department a forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure the defendant's appearance in court, a payment of a fine, penalty, or court cost, a plea of guilty or nolo contendere or a finding of guilt, or a finding that any person has committed a traffic infraction an abstract of the court record in the form prescribed by rule of the supreme court, showing the conviction of any person or the finding that any person has committed a traffic infraction in said court for a violation of any said laws other than regulations governing standing, stopping, parking, and pedestrian offenses.(2) Every state agency or municipality having jurisdiction over offenses committed under this chapter, or under any other act of this state or municipal ordinance adopted by a state or local authority regulating the operation of motor vehicles on highways, may forward to the department within 10 days of failure to respond, failure to pay a penalty, failure to appear at a hearing to contest the determination that a violation of any statute, ordinance, or regulation relating to standing, stopping, parking, or civil penalties issued under RCW 46.63.160 or 46.63.200 has been committed, or failure to appear at a hearing to explain mitigating circumstances, an abstract of the citation record in the form prescribed by rule of the department, showing the finding by such municipality that two or more violations of laws governing standing, stopping, and parking or one or more civil penalties issued under RCW 46.63.160 or 46.63.200 have been committed and indicating the nature of the defendant's failure to act. Such violations or infractions may not have occurred while the vehicle is stolen from the registered owner. The department may enter into agreements of reciprocity with the duly authorized representatives of the states for reporting to each other violations of laws governing standing, stopping, and parking.(3) For the purposes of this title and except as defined in RCW 46.25.010, "conviction" means a final conviction in a state or municipal court or by any federal authority having jurisdiction over offenses substantially the same as those set forth in this title which occur on federal installations in this state, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure a defendant's appearance in court, the payment of a fine or court cost, a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, or a finding of guilt on a traffic law violation charge, regardless of whether the imposition of sentence or sanctions are deferred or the penalty is suspended, but not including entry into a deferred prosecution agreement under chapter 10.05 RCW or entry into a judicially authorized dismissal of a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor following substantial compliance with court-ordered conditions under section 2 of this act.(4) Perfection of a notice of appeal shall stay the execution of the sentence pertaining to the withholding of the driving privilege.(5) For the purposes of this title, "finding that a traffic infraction has been committed" means a failure to respond to a notice of infraction or a determination made by a court pursuant to this chapter. Payment of a monetary penalty made pursuant to RCW 46.63.070(2) is deemed equivalent to such a finding.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. Section 2 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 10 RCW.--- END ---